District of Columbia statutes.
7-1551.32

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-287, § 3, 57 DCR 11495